California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) A county shall consider relevant data sources, including local data, to guide addressing local needs, including the prevalence of mental health and substance use disorders, the unmet need for mental health and substance use disorder treatment in the county, behavioral health disparities, and the homelessness point-in-time count, in preparing each integrated plan and annual update, and should use the data to demonstrate how the plan appropriately allocates funding between mental health
 and substance use disorder treatment services.

(3) A county shall consider the population needs assessment of each Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, that covers residents of the county in preparing each integrated plan and annual update.

(4) A county shall consider the community health improvement plan of the local health jurisdiction for the county in preparing each integrated plan and annual update.

(5) A county shall stratify data to identify behavioral health disparities and consider approaches to eliminate disparities, including, but not limited to, promising practices, models of care, community-defined evidence practices, workforce diversity, and cultural responsiveness in preparing each integrated plan and annual update.

(6) A county shall report and consider the achievement of defined goals and outcomes measures of the prior integrated plan and annual update, in addition to other data and information as specified by the department pursuant to Section 5963.05, in preparing each integrated plan and annual update.

(7) A county with a population greater than 200,000 shall collaborate with the five most populous cities in the county, managed care plans, and continuums of care to outline respective responsibilities and coordination of services related to housing interventions described in Section 5830.

(8) A county shall consider input and feedback into the plan provided by stakeholders, including, but not limited to, those with lived behavioral health experience, including peers and families.

(c) The integrated plan and annual updates shall include a section for each of the following:

(1) (A) Community mental health services provided pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600).

(B) Programs and services funded from the Behavioral Health Services Fund pursuant to Section 5890, including a description of how the county meets the requirements of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b).

(C) Programs and services funded by the Projects for Assistance in Transition from Homelessness grant pursuant to Sections 290cc-21 to 290cc-35, inclusive, of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(D) Programs and services funded by the Community Mental Health Services Block Grant pursuant to Sections 300x to 300x-9, inclusive, of
 Title 42 of the United States Code.

(E) Programs and services funded by the Substance Abuse Block Grant pursuant to Sections 300x-21 to 300x-35, inclusive, of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(F) Programs and services provided pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 14680) of Chapter 8.8 of Part 3 of Division 9 and Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700) of Part 3 of Division 9.

(G) Programs and services provided pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 14124.20) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(H) Programs and services provided pursuant to Section 14184.401.

(I) Programs and services funded by distributions from the Opioid Settlements Fund established pursuant
 to Section 12534 of the Government Code.

(J) Services provided through other federal grants or other county mental health and substance use disorder programs.

(2) A budget that includes the county planned expenditures and reserves for the county distributions from the Behavioral Health Service Fund and any other funds allocated to the county to provide the services and programs set forth in paragraph (1). The budget shall also include proposed adjustments pursuant to the requirements set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5892 and subdivision (d) of Section 5892.2.

(3) (A) A
 description of how the integrated plan and annual update aligns with statewide behavioral health goals and outcome measures, including goals and outcome measures to reduce identified disparities, as defined by the department in consultation with counties, stakeholders, and the Behavioral Health Services and Oversight Accountability Commission, pursuant to Section 5963.05.

(B) Outcome measures may include, but are not limited to, measures that demonstrate achievement of goals to reduce homelessness among those eligible for housing interventions pursuant to Section 5830 and measures that demonstrate reductions in the number of people who are justice-involved in the county and who are eligible adults or older adults, as defined in Section 5892, or eligible children and youth, as defined in Section 5892.

(4) A description of how the integrated plan aligns with local goals and outcome
 measures for behavioral health, including goals and outcome measures to reduce identified disparities.

(5) The programs and services specified in paragraph (1) shall include descriptions of efforts to reduce identified disparities in behavioral health outcomes.

(6) A description of the data sources considered to meet the requirements specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(7) A description of how the county has considered the unique needs of LGBTQ+ youth, justice-involved youth, child welfare-involved, justice-involved adults, and older adults in the housing intervention program pursuant to Part 3.2 (commencing with Section 5830) and Full Service Partnership program pursuant to Part 4.1 (commencing with Section 5887).

(8) A description of its
 workforce strategy, to include actions the county will take to ensure its county and noncounty contracted behavioral health workforce is well-supported and culturally and linguistically concordant with the population to be served, and robust enough to achieve the statewide and local behavioral health goals and measures. This description shall include how the county will do all of the following:

(A) Maintain and monitor a network of appropriate, high-quality, culturally and linguistically concordant county and noncounty contracted providers, where applicable, that is sufficient to provide adequate access to services and supports for individuals with behavioral health needs.

(B) Meet federal and state standards for timely access to care and services, considering the urgency of the need for services.

(C) Ensure the
 health and welfare of the individual and support community integration of the individual.

(D) Promote the delivery of services in a culturally competent manner to all individuals, including those with limited English proficiency and diverse cultural and ethnic backgrounds and disabilities, regardless of age, religion, sexual orientation, and gender identity.

(E) Ensure physical access, reasonable accommodations, and accessible equipment for individuals with physical, intellectual and developmental, and mental disabilities.

(F) Select and retain all contracted network providers, including ensuring all contracted providers meet minimum standards for license, certification, training, experience, and credentialing requirements.

(G) Ensure that the
 contractor’s hiring practices meet applicable nondiscrimination standards and demonstrate best practices in promoting diversity and equity.

(H) Adequately fund contracts to ensure that noncounty contracted providers are resourced to achieve the behavioral health goals outlined in their contract for the purposes of meeting statewide metrics.

(I) Conduct oversight of compliance of all federal and state laws and regulations of all contracted network providers.

(J) Fill county vacancies and retain county employees providing direct behavioral health services, if applicable.

(9) A description of the system developed to transition a beneficiary’s care between the beneficiary’s mental health plan and their managed care plan based upon the beneficiary’s health
 condition.

(10) Certification by the county behavioral health director, that ensures that the county has complied with all pertinent regulations, laws, and statutes, including stakeholder participation requirements.

(11) Certification by the county behavioral health director and by the county chief administration officer or their designee that the county has complied with fiscal accountability requirements, as directed by the department, and that all expenditures are consistent with applicable state and federal law.

(d) The county shall submit its integrated plan and annual updates to the department and the commission in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(e) The department shall post on its internet website, in a timely manner, the
 integrated plan submitted by every county pursuant to this section.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 66.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5963.03.

(a) (1) Each integrated plan shall be developed with local stakeholders, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892.

(B) Families of eligible children and youth, eligible adults, and eligible older adults, as defined in Section 5892.

(C) Youths or youth mental health or substance use disorder organizations.

(D) Providers of mental health
 services and substance use disorder treatment services.

(E) Public safety partners, including county juvenile justice agencies.

(F) Local education agencies.

(G) Higher education partners.

(H) Early childhood organizations.

(I) Local public health jurisdictions.

(J) County social services and child welfare agencies.

(K) Labor representative organizations.

(L) Veterans.

(M) Representatives from veterans organizations.

(N) Health care organizations, including hospitals.

(O) Health care service plans, including Medi-Cal managed care plans as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101.

(P) Disability insurers.

(Q) Tribal and Indian Health Program designees established for Medi-Cal
 Tribal consultation purposes.

(R) The five most populous cities in counties with a population greater than 200,000.

(S) Area agencies on aging.

(T) Independent living centers.

(U) Continuums of care, including representatives from the homeless service provider community.

(V) Regional centers.

(W) Emergency medical services.

(X) Community-based organizations serving culturally and linguistically diverse constituents. 

(2) (A) (i) A county shall demonstrate a partnership with constituents and stakeholders throughout the process that includes meaningful stakeholder involvement on mental health and substance use disorder policy, program planning, and implementation, monitoring, workforce, quality improvement, health equity, evaluation, and budget allocations.

(ii) Stakeholders shall include sufficient participation of individuals representing diverse viewpoints, including, but not limited to, representatives from youth from historically marginalized
 communities, representatives from organizations specializing in working with underserved racially and ethnically diverse communities, representatives from LGBTQ+ communities, victims of domestic violence and sexual abuse, and people with lived experience of homelessness.

(iii) A county may provide supports, including, but not limited to, training and technical assistance, to ensure stakeholders, including peers and families, receive sufficient information and data to meaningfully participate in the development of integrated plans and annual updates.

(B) A draft plan and update shall be prepared and circulated for review and comment for at least 30 days to
 representatives of stakeholder interest and any interested party who has requested a copy of the draft plan.

(b) (1) The behavioral health board established pursuant to Section 5604 shall conduct a public hearing on the draft integrated plan and annual updates at the close of the 30-day comment period required by subdivision (a).

(2) Each adopted integrated plan and update shall include substantive written recommendations for revisions.

(3) The adopted integrated plan or update shall summarize and analyze the recommended revisions.

(4) The behavioral health board shall review the adopted integrated plan or update and make recommendations to the local mental health agency, local substance use disorder agency, or local behavioral health agency, as applicable, for revisions.

(5) The local mental health agency, local substance use disorder agency, or local behavioral health agency, as applicable, shall provide an annual report of written explanations to the local governing body and the department for substantive recommendations made by the local behavioral health board that are not included in the final integrated plan or update.

(6) A county may provide training to ensure stakeholders
 receive sufficient information and data to meaningfully participate in the development of integrated plans and annual updates.

(c) (1) A county shall prepare annual updates to its integrated plan and may prepare intermittent updates.

(2) In preparing annual and intermittent updates:

(A) A county is not required to comply with the stakeholder process described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(B) A county shall post on its internet website all updates to its integrated plan and a summary and justification of the changes made by the updates for a 30-day comment
 period prior to the effective date of the updates.

(d) For purposes of this section, “substantive recommendations made by the local behavioral health board” means a recommendation that is brought before the board and approved by a majority vote of the membership present at a public hearing of the local behavioral health board that has established a quorum.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 109.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5963.04.

(a) (1) Annually, counties and Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101, shall submit the County Behavioral Health Outcomes, Accountability, and Transparency Report to the department.

(2) This report shall include the following data and information that shall be submitted in a form, manner, and in accordance with timelines prescribed by the department:

(A) The county’s annual allocation of state and federal behavioral health funds, by category.

(B) The county’s annual expenditure of state and federal behavioral health funds, by category.

(C) The amounts of annual and cumulative unspent state and federal behavioral health funds, including funds in a reserve account, by category.

(D) The county’s annual expenditure of county general funds and other funds, by category, on mental health or substance use disorder treatment services.

(E) The sources and amounts spent annually as the nonfederal share for Medi-Cal specialty mental health services and Medi-Cal substance use disorder treatment services, by category.

(F) All administrative costs, by category.

(G) All contracted services, and the cost of those contracted services, by category.

(H) Information on behavioral
 health services provided to persons not covered by Medi-Cal, including, but not limited to, those who are uninsured or covered by Medicare or commercial insurance, by category.

(I) Other data and information, which shall include, but is not limited to, information on spending on children and youth, service utilization data, performance outcome measures across all behavioral health delivery systems, and data and information pertaining to populations with identified disparities in behavioral health outcomes, as specified by the department. This shall include data through the lens of health equity to identify racial, ethnic, age, gender, and other demographic disparities and inform disparity reduction efforts. Other data and information may include the number of people who are eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892, who are incarcerated, experiencing homelessness, inclusive of the availability of housing, the number of
 eligible children and youth, as defined in Section 5892, who access evidence based early psychosis and mood disorder detection and intervention programs.

(J) Data and information on workforce measures and metrics, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Vacancies and efforts to fill vacancies.

(ii) The number of county employees providing direct clinical behavioral health services.

(iii) Whether there is a net change in the number of county employees providing direct clinical behavioral health services compared to the prior year and an explanation for that change.

(b) The department shall establish metrics, in consultation with counties, stakeholders, and the Behavioral
 Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission to measure and evaluate the quality and efficacy of the behavioral health services and programs listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5963.02. The metrics shall be used to identify demographic and geographic disparities in the quality and efficacy of behavioral health services and programs listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5963.02.

(c) Each county’s board of supervisors shall attest that the County Behavioral Health Outcomes, Accountability, and Transparency Report is complete and accurate before it is submitted to the department.

(d) Each year, the department shall post on its internet website a statewide County Behavioral Health Outcomes, Accountability, and Transparency Report.

(e) (1) The department
 may require a county or Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101, to revise its integrated plan or annual update pursuant to Section 5963.02 if the department determines the plan or update fails to adequately address local needs pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5963.02.

(2) The department may impose a corrective action plan or require a county or Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101, to revise its integrated plan or annual update pursuant to Section 5963.02 if the department determines that the county or delivery system fails to make adequate progress in meeting the metrics established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) (A) (i) If a county or Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system
 fails to submit the data and information specified in subdivision (a) by the required deadline, or as otherwise required by the department, fails to allocate funding pursuant to Section 5892, fails to comply with the expenditure requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5892.2 or fails to follow the process pursuant to Section 5963.03, the department may impose a corrective action plan, monetary sanctions, or temporarily withhold payments to the county or Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system, pursuant to Section 14197.7.

(ii) Subject to the guidance issued pursuant to Section 5963.05, if a county’s actual expenditures of its allocations from the Behavioral Health Services Fund significantly varies from its budget in Section 5963.02, the department may impose a corrective action plan, monetary sanctions, or temporarily
 withhold payments to the county pursuant to Section 14197.7.

(iii) Notwithstanding subdivision (o) of Section 14197.7, temporarily withheld payments shall be withheld from the Behavioral Health Services Fund.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subdivision (q) of Section 14197.7, monetary sanctions collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Behavioral Health Services Act Accountability Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(ii) Subject to the department’s guidance issued pursuant to Section 5963.05, all monies in the Behavioral Health Services Act Accountability Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated and distributed to the county that paid the monetary sanction upon the department’s determination that the county has come into compliance.

(C) The department shall temporarily withhold amounts it deems necessary to ensure the county or Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system comes into compliance.

(D) The department shall release the temporarily withheld funds when it determines the county or Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system has come into compliance.

(f) This section shall be read in conjunction with, and apply in addition to, any other applicable law that authorizes the department to impose sanctions or otherwise take remedial actions against a county and Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary
 election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 67.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5963.05.

(a) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the amendments made pursuant to this act by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking further regulatory action.

(b) By July 1, 2033, the department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement, interpret, or make specific the amendments made pursuant to this act in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) For purposes of implementing this act, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis, including contracts to implement new or change existing information technology systems.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended, or changes to existing information technology systems made pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 12100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the Statewide Information
 Management Manual, and the State Administrative Manual and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 109.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5963.06.

(a) The California State Auditor shall, no later than December 31, 2029, issue to the Governor, the Legislature, the Senate and Assembly Committees on Health, the Assembly Committee on Housing and Community Development, and the Senate Committee on Housing, a comprehensive report on the progress and effectiveness of the implementation of the Behavioral Health Services Act.

(b) The California State Auditor shall conduct the audit required pursuant to subdivision (a) every three years
 thereafter with the final audit due on or before December 31, 2035. The final report shall include final findings, conclusions, and recommendations on the topics addressed in the previous reports.

(1) The California State Auditor shall make their reports available to the public.

(2) The California State Auditor shall make every effort to provide affected entities with an opportunity to reply to any facts, findings, issues, or conclusions in their reports with which the department may disagree.

(c) The audit conducted pursuant to this section shall include an assessment of the following:

(1) The impact of the policy changes of the Behavioral Health Services
 Act on the overall delivery of behavioral health services in California.

(2) The timeliness and thoroughness of guidance issued and training and technical assistance provided to impacted entities by the state as it transitions from the existing behavioral health system of care to the reforms envisioned pursuant to this act.

(3) The implementation of the Behavioral Health Services Act by each of the primary entities involved in the transition and implementation, including, but not limited to, the California Health and Human Services Agency, State Department of Health Care Services, Department of Health Care Access and Information, State Department of Public Health, Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, counties, and county behavioral health directors.

(4) How counties demonstrate progress towards meeting the statewide behavioral health goals and outcome measures developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 5963.02.

(5) The fiscal and programmatic aspects of the Behavioral Health Services Act, including reserve levels, reversion activity, services and system outcomes, workforce training, workforce capacity, number of individuals served, number of individuals receiving services, number of individuals receiving housing interventions, as reported to the department by counties.

(6) The revised Behavioral Health Services Act allocations pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892, gaps in service,
 and trends in unmet needs.

(7) The degree to which the inclusion of substance use disorders, substance use disorder treatment services, and substance use disorder personnel into the Behavioral Health Services Act has impacted the system of behavioral health care and the degree to which inclusion in the Behavioral Health Services Act has been initially successful.

(8) The effectiveness and outcomes achieved through the population-based prevention programs developed and implemented by the State Department of Public Health.

(9) The effectiveness and compliance by the counties with the revised reporting requirements under the act that added this section.

(10) The department’s oversight of the revised Integrated Plan for Behavioral Health Services and Outcomes and County Behavioral Health Outcomes, Accountability, and Transparency Report, including the use of corrective action plans or sanctions, or both.

(11) The coordination and collaboration occurring throughout the transition period between, but not limited to, the California Health and Human Services Agency, State Department of Health Care Services, Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, counties, and county behavioral health directors, and an identification of areas of improvement if warranted.

(12) Recommendations on any changes or improvements indicated by the audit pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) The California Health and Human Services Agency, State Department of Health Care Services, counties, and Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission staff shall cooperate with all requests of the California State Auditor to the extent such information is available and the State Department of Health Care Services, counties, and Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall provide data, information, and case files as requested by the California State Auditor to perform all of their duties, to the extent that information is available.

(2) The California State Auditor may also provide in its reports, additional information to either the department or the Legislature at their discretion or at the request of
 either the department or the Legislature.

(e) The California State Auditor shall, in making its recommendations, indicate the predicted quickest method of implementing those recommendations, including, but not limited to, regulatory or statutory changes.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election. 

(g) This section shall become inoperative on June 30, 2036, and, as of January 1, 2037, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 109.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.   Inoperative June 30, 2036, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2037, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Hospital, Emergency Medical Services, and Behavioral Health Facilities Bed Capacity Data Solution [5964. - 5964.]

5964.

(a) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services may impose a plan of correction or assess civil money penalties pursuant to paragraph (2), or both, against a specified entity licensed or certified by the State Department of Health Care Services that fails to submit data accurately, timely, or as required pursuant to Section 131425 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services may determine a reasonable length of time for the facility to complete a plan of correction. The State Department of Health Care Services may issue a notice of imposition of civil money penalties if the facility fails to complete a plan of correction by the time specified. The State Department of Health Care
 Services may assess penalties against a facility in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per day from the date of notice of imposition of penalties.

(3) A facility may submit a written grievance to the State Department of Health Care Services within 15 working days of the issuance of the notice specified in paragraph (2). The facility shall include any supporting documentation and explain any mitigating circumstances. The State Department of Health Care Services shall make a determination on the grievance within 90 calendar days of receipt of a complete grievance.

(4) A facility may request a formal hearing within 30 calendar days of the State Department of Health Care Services’ determination on the grievance pursuant to paragraph (3). Hearings to review the imposition of civil money penalties shall be conducted pursuant to the requirements set forth in Section 100171 of the
 Health and Safety Code. Civil money penalties against a facility shall continue to accrue until the effective date of the final decision of the State Department of Health Care Services.

(5) The State Department of Health Care Services may obtain a court order to recover unpaid civil money penalties against a specified entity licensed or certified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, civil money penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the General Fund for use, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for costs for behavioral health care services furnished to persons eligible for the Medi-Cal program, including persons dually eligible for the Medi-Cal program and the Medicare Program.

(c) The State Department of Health Care
 Services shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of information notices, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without further regulatory action.

(e) For purposes of this section, “specified entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 131400 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 999, Sec. 5.   (AB 177)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Behavioral Health Infrastructure Bond Act of 2024 [5965. - 5967.01.]

5965.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Behavioral Health Infrastructure Bond Act of 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.01.

The purposes and intent in enacting this act are as follows:

(a) Bonds issued under this act are to develop an array of treatment, residential care settings, and supportive housing to help provide appropriate care facilities for Californians experiencing mental health conditions and substance use disorders.

(b) The bond will dedicate funding for veterans with a behavioral health challenge or substance use disorder and at risk of experiencing homelessness.

(c) Efforts to streamline the process for approving projects and renovating or building new facilities to accelerate the delivery of care in residential settings made available
 through additional Behavioral Health Services Act and bond financing is a priority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.02.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Act” means the Behavioral Health Infrastructure Bond Act of 2024 (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5965)).

(b) “Behavioral health challenge” includes, but is not limited to, serious mental illness, as described in subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 14184.402, or a substance use disorder, as described in Section 5891.5.

(c) “Board” means, with respect to the bond proceeds referenced in
 paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 5965.04, and with respect to and for requests up to the amount specified for bond proceeds referenced in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 5965.04, for purposes of Section 5965.12 of this code and Section 16726 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services, and with respect to bond proceeds referenced in
 paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5965.04, and, with respect to and for requests up to the amount specified for bond proceeds referenced in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5965.04, for purposes of Section 5965.12 of this code and Section 16726 of the Government Code, the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(d) “Committee” means the Behavioral Health Infrastructure Bond Act Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 5965.07.

(e) “Fund” means the Behavioral Health Infrastructure Fund created pursuant to Section 5965.03.

(f) “State General
 Obligation Bond Law” means the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), as it may be amended.

(g) “Target population” means a person described in subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 14184.402, or a person with a substance use disorder, as described in Section 5891.5, except that enrollment in Medi-Cal or in any other health plan shall not be a condition for accessing housing or continuing to be housed.

(h) “Veteran” means a person who served in the active military, naval, or air service, and who was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.03.

(a) The proceeds of interim debt and bonds, excluding proceeds used directly to repay interim debt and excluding bonds issued in accordance with Section 5965.14, issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Behavioral Health Infrastructure Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) All moneys in the fund, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are hereby continuously appropriated without respect to fiscal years for the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Bonds shall be issued and delivered in the amount determined by the committee to be necessary or desirable pursuant
 to Section 5965.08.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 4.   (AB 531)   Effective March 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5965.04.

(a) Moneys in the fund shall be used for any of the following purposes:

(1) Making loans or grants administered by the Department of Housing and Community Development to eligible entities specified under Section 50675.1.3 of the Health and Safety Code or loans to development sponsors as defined under Section 50675.2 of the Health and Safety Code to acquire capital assets for the conversion, rehabilitation, or new construction of permanent supportive housing, including scattered site projects, for veterans or their households, who are homeless, chronically homeless, or are at risk of homelessness, as defined by Part 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and meet the criteria of the target population.

(2) Making loans or grants administered by the Department of Housing and Community Development to eligible entities specified under Section 50675.1.3 of the Health and Safety Code or loans to development sponsors as defined under Section 50675.2 of the Health and Safety Code to acquire capital assets for the conversion, rehabilitation, or new construction of permanent supportive housing, including scattered site projects for persons who are homeless, chronically homeless, or are at risk of homelessness, as defined by Part 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and are living with a behavioral health challenge.

(3) Making grants administered by the State Department of Health Care Services, as specified under the Behavioral Health Continuum Infrastructure Program to eligible entities specified pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5960) to construct, acquire, and
 rehabilitate real estate assets or to invest in needed infrastructure to expand the continuum of behavioral health treatment resources to build new capacity or expand existing capacity for short-term crisis stabilization, acute and subacute care, crisis residential, community-based mental health residential, substance use disorder residential, peer respite, community and outpatient behavioral health services, and other clinically enriched longer term treatment and rehabilitation options for persons with behavioral health disorders in the least restrictive and least costly setting.

(4) (A) Paying the costs of issuing bonds, paying the annual administration costs of the bonds, and paying interest on bonds.

(B) In addition, moneys in the fund or other proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter may be used to pay principal of, or redemption premium
 on, interim debt issued prior to the issuance of bonds authorized by this chapter.

(b) Moneys in the fund shall be allocated as follows:
